Montana, session 2025, SB346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 39-71-610, MCA, is amended to read:
"39-71-610. Termination of benefits by insurer -- department order to pay disputed benefits
prior to hearing or mediation -- limitation on order -- right of reimbursement. (1) If an insurer terminates
biweekly compensation benefits and the termination of compensation benefits is disputed by the claimant, the
department may, upon on written request, order an insurer to pay additional biweekly compensation benefits
prior to a hearing before the workers' compensation court or prior to mediation, but the biweekly compensation
benefits may not be ordered to be paid under this section for a period exceeding 49 days or for any period
subsequent to the date of the hearing or mediation. A party may appeal this order to the workers' compensation
court. A proceeding in the workers' compensation court brought pursuant to this section is a new proceeding
and is not subject to mediation. If after a hearing before the workers' compensation court it is held that the
insurer was not liable for the compensation payments ordered by the department, the insurer has the right to be
reimbursed for the payments by the claimant.
(2) Benefits may be ordered only on the claimant demonstrating, on a more probable than not
basis, that the claimant will prevail.
(3) This section does not apply to disputes regarding:
(a) the insurer's selection of a treating physician;
(b) the refusal to cooperate with medical care;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 346

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 346.1
(c) unaccepted body parts;
(d) the refusal to cooperate with the nurse case manager; or
(e) the refusal to cooperate with an independent medical examination.
(4) Compensation benefits awarded under this section are stayed on appeal."

Section 2. Section 39-71-615, MCA, is amended to read:
"39-71-615. Payment of medical claims without acceptance of liability. (1) An insurer may pay a
medical claim that is based upon on the report of a nonwage loss injury or occupational disease without the
payments being construed as an acceptance of liability for the claim.
(2) An insurer shall, within 10 days of making payment under subsection (1), notify the worker of
the payment of the medical claim without acceptance of liability.
(3) Upon On written request by a worker for the payment of indemnity benefits or for a
determination of liability, the insurer shall investigate the claim to determine liability for the injury or occupational
disease under 39-71-606 or 39-71-608.
(4) An insurer may not be required to pay compensation benefits under this section."

Section 3. Section 39-71-1106, MCA, is amended to read:
"39-71-1106. Compliance with medical treatment required -- termination of compensation
benefits for noncompliance. An insurer that provides 14 days' notice to the worker and the department may
terminate any compensation benefits that the worker is receiving until the worker cooperates, if the insurer
believes that the worker is unreasonably refusing:
(1) to cooperate with a managed care organization, a preferred provider organization, or the
treating physician;
(2) to submit to medical treatment recommended by the treating physician, except for invasive
procedures; or
(3) to provide access to health care information to health care providers, the insurer, or an agent of
the insurer;
(4) to comply with the insurer's selection of the treating physician; or
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 346

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 346.1
(5) to cooperate with the nurse case manager or obstructs the nurse case manager's ability to
communicate with health care providers."
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 346